West Virginia, session 2025, HB2584.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. purchasing division. §5A-3-64. Elimination of statewide contracts to out of state vendors. (a) Legislative findings. - The Legislature finds that the elimination of statewide contracts to out of state vendors will save the State of West Virginia money, spur economic growth within the state, and will reward businesses in West Virginia.(b)  Elimination of contacts with out of state vendors. – All state agencies in West Virginia, as well as the West Virginia Division of Highways, shall be prohibited from entering into contracts with out of state vendors, and shall find a suitable in-state vendor or business to engage with.(c) Limited exception. – Contracts may only be completed with out of state vendors when no in-state vendors or businesses are available to do the services sought. A higher price for an in-state vendor as opposed to an out of state vendor is not a suitable exception.(d) Effective date. – This section shall become effective July 1, 2025.